Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2093.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 72 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 19UNSPENT APPROPRIATIONSSec.1901. Definitions.1902. Reports by Auditor General.§ 1901. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth agency." Any office, department, authority, board, multistate agency or commission of the executive branch. 123456789101112131415161718 The term includes the following:(1) The Office of the Governor.(2) The Office of Lieutenant Governor.(3) The Office of Attorney General.(4) The Department of the Auditor General.(5) The Treasury Department.(6) An independent agency.(7) A State-affiliated entity.(8) A State-related institution."Independent agency." A board, commission or other agency or officer of the Commonwealth which is not subject to the policy supervision and control of the Governor. The term does not include:(1) A court or other officer or agency of the unified judicial system.(2) The General Assembly or its officers or agencies.(3) A State-related institution, political subdivision or local, regional or metropolitan transportation authority."State-affiliated entity." A Commonwealth authority or Commonwealth entity. The following shall apply:(1) The term includes the following:(i) The Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency and an entity established by the agency.(ii) The Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board.(iii) The Pennsylvania Game Commission.(iv) The Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission.(v) The Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency.(vi) The State System of Higher Education.(vii) A community college.(viii) The Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission.20250HB2093PN2689 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ix) The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission.(x) The Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority.(xi) The Pennsylvania Interscholastic Athletic Association.(2) The term does not include a State-related institution."State-related institution." Includes the following:(1) The Pennsylvania State University.(2) The University of Pittsburgh.(3) Temple University.(4) Lincoln University.§ 1902. Reports by Auditor General.(a) Requirements.--(1) No later than November 15 of each calendar year, each Commonwealth agency shall provide the Auditor General with information described under subsection (b)(1) and (2) and any other information that the Auditor General deems necessary or proper to carry out its duties under this chapter.(2) No later than December 30 of each calendar year, the Auditor General shall report in writing to the General Assembly on the ending monetary balances of all accounts for Commonwealth agencies for the prior fiscal year.(b) Contents.--Each report of the Auditor General under this section shall contain a full and substantive analysis, along with statistical information, of the monetary balances described under subsection (a) and shall:(1) Identify the amount of unspent money for each Commonwealth agency. If a Commonwealth agency has unspent 20250HB2093PN2689 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 money appropriated from the General Fund, the Auditor General shall break down that amount of money based on each corresponding line item in the State budget.(2) Provide a summary of the total amount of unspent money by each Commonwealth agency and the amounts of unspent money by fund type. The summary shall include the fund name and a comparison of unspent money by the Commonwealth agency appropriated from the fund in the prior three fiscal years.(3) Provide recommendations for addressing the accumulation of unspent money for each Commonwealth agency to avoid waste, mismanagement, inefficiency and fraud.(4) Include other information which the Auditor General deems necessary or appropriate.Section 2. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) This section shall take effect immediately.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect July 1 of the year immediately following the date of enactment.20250HB2093PN2689 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617